Idaho, session 2025, H0268.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5303. APPLICATION TO STATE EMPLOYEES. All departments of the state
of Idaho and all employees in such departments, except those employees
specifically defined as nonclassified, shall be classified employees who
are subject to this chapter and to the system of personnel administration
it prescribes. All nonclassified employees are subject to conformity with
classified positions as set forth in section 59-1603, Idaho Code. Nonclas-
sified employees shall be:
(a) Members of the state legislature and all other officers of the state
of Idaho elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in
elective offices and employees of the state legislature.
(b) Members of statutory boards and commissions and heads of depart-
ments appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the governor, deputy di-
rectors appointed by the director of a department, and members of advisory
boards and councils appointed by the departments.
(c) All employees and officers in the office, and at the residence, of
the governor; and all employees and officers in the offices of the lieutenant
governor, secretary of state, attorney general, state treasurer, state con-
troller, and state superintendent of public instruction.
(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, one (1) declared position des-
ignated by the appointing authority of a participating department, in addi-
tion to those declared to be nonclassified by other provisions of law.
(e) Part-time professional consultants who are paid on a fee basis for
any form of legal, medical or other professional service and who are not en-
gaged in the performance of administrative duties for the state.
(f) Judges, temporary referees, receivers and jurors.
(g) All employees of the Idaho supreme court, Idaho court of appeals and
district courts.
(h) All employees of the Idaho state bar.
(i) Assistant attorneys general attached to the office of the attorney
general.
(j) Officers, members of the teaching staffs of state higher educa-
tional institutions, the professional staffs of the office of the state
board of education and the Idaho department of education administered by the
board of regents and the board of education, all professional staff of the


public charter school commission, and the professional staffs of the Idaho
division of career technical education and vocational rehabilitation admin-
istered by the state board for career technical education. "Teaching staff"
includes teachers, coaches, resident directors, librarians and those prin-
cipally engaged in academic research. The word "officer" means presidents,
vice presidents, deans, directors, or employees in positions designated by
the state board who receive an annual salary of not less than step A of the pay
grade equivalent to three hundred fifty-five (355) Hay points in the state
compensation schedule. In consultation with the Idaho division of human
resources, the state board of education shall implement policies and pro-
cedures for nonclassified employees to conform with section 59-1603, Idaho
Code.
(k) Employees of the military division.
(l) Patients, inmates or students employed in a state institution.
(m) Temporary employees.
(n) All employees and officers of the following named commodity commis-
sions, and all employees and officers of any commodity commission created
hereafter: the Idaho potato commission, as provided in chapter 12, title 22,
Idaho Code; the Idaho honey commission, as provided in chapter 28, title 22,
Idaho Code; the Idaho bean commission, as provided in chapter 29, title 22,
Idaho Code; the Idaho hop grower's commission, as provided in chapter 31, ti-
tle 22, Idaho Code; the Idaho wheat commission, as provided in chapter 33,
title 22, Idaho Code; the Idaho pea and lentil commission, as provided in
chapter 35, title 22, Idaho Code; the Idaho apple commission, as provided in
chapter 36, title 22, Idaho Code; the Idaho cherry commission, as provided in
chapter 37, title 22, Idaho Code; the Idaho mint commission, as provided in
chapter 38, title 22, Idaho Code; the Idaho sheep and goat health board, as
provided in chapter 1, title 25, Idaho Code; the state brand inspector, and
all district supervisors, as provided in chapter 11, title 25, Idaho Code;
the Idaho beef council, as provided in chapter 29, title 25, Idaho Code; and
the Idaho dairy products commission, as provided in chapter 31, title 25,
Idaho Code.
(o) All inspectors of the fresh fruit and vegetable inspection service
of the Idaho department of agriculture, except those positions involved in
the management of the program.
(p) All employees of correctional industries within the department of
correction.
(q) All deputy administrators and wardens employed by the department of
correction. Deputy administrators are defined as only the deputy adminis-
trators working directly for the nonclassified division administrators un-
der the director of the department of correction.
(r) All public information positions, with the exception of secretar-
ial positions, in any department.
(s) Any division administrator and all executive employees.
(t) Any regional administrator or division administrator in the de-
partment of environmental quality.
(u) All employees of the division of financial management, all employ-
ees of the STEM action center, all employees of the office of species conser-
vation, all employees of the office of drug policy, and all employees of the
office of energy and mineral resources.


(v) All employees of the Idaho food quality assurance institute.
(w) All employees of the office of the state appellate public defender,
pursuant to chapter 59, title 19, Idaho Code, and the office of the state pub-
lic defender, pursuant to chapter 60, title 19, Idaho Code.
(x) All quality assurance specialists or medical investigators of the
Idaho board of medicine.
(y) All pest survey and detection employees and their supervisors hired
specifically to carry out activities under the Idaho plant pest act, chapter
20, title 22, Idaho Code, including but not limited to pest survey, detec-
tion, and eradication, except those positions involved in the management of
the program.
(z) All medical directors employed by the department of health and
welfare who are engaged in the practice of medicine, as defined by section
54-1803, Idaho Code, at a state hospital or other treatment facility managed
and operated by the department of health and welfare.
(aa) All hearing officers and all other employees of the office of ad-
ministrative hearings, as provided for in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-5302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5302. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter and other applicable
sections of the Idaho Code, each of the terms defined in this section shall
have the meaning given in this section unless a different meaning is clearly
required by the context. Such terms and their definitions are:
(1) "Administrative employee" means any person, nonclassified or clas-
sified, appointed to a position that meets the criteria set forth in the fed-
eral fair labor standards act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq. Final designation of
a classified position as "administrative" within this definition shall be
made by the administrator of the division of human resources. Exceptions to
this designation that do not violate the federal fair labor standards act, 29
U.S.C. 201 et seq., may be made by the administrator.
(2) "Administrator" means the administrator of the division of human
resources in the governor's office.
(3) "Appointing authority" means the officer, board, commission, per-
son or group of persons authorized by statute or lawfully delegated author-
ity to make appointments to or employ personnel in any department.
(4) "Class" means a group of positions sufficiently similar as to the
duties performed, degree of supervision exercised or required, minimum re-
quirements of training, experience or skill, and other characteristics that
the same title, the same tests of fitness and the same schedule of compensa-
tion may be applied to each position in the group.
(5) "Classified officer" or "classified employee" means any person ap-
pointed to or holding a position in any department of the state of Idaho,
which position is subject to the provisions of the merit examination, selec-
tion, retention, promotion and dismissal requirements of section 67-5309,
Idaho Code.
(6) "Commission" means the Idaho personnel commission.
(7) "Compensatory time" means approved time off from duty provided in
compensation for overtime hours worked.


(8) "Computer worker" means any person, nonclassified or classified,
appointed to a position that meets the criteria set forth in the federal fair
labor standards act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq. Final designation of a classified
position as "computer worker" within this definition shall be made by the ad-
ministrator of the division of human resources. Exceptions to this designa-
tion that do not violate the federal fair labor standards act, 29 U.S.C. 201
et seq., may be made by the administrator.
(9) "Department" means any department, agency, institution or office
of the state of Idaho.
(10) "Disabled veteran" is as defined in section 65-502, Idaho Code.
(11) "Eligible" means a person who has been determined to be qualified
for a classified position and whose name has been placed on the register of
eligibles.
(12)(a) "Executive employee" means any person, nonclassified or clas-
sified, appointed to a position equivalent to a bureau chief or above as
provided in section 67-2402, Idaho Code, or any employee whose primary
duty is management of a department, division or bureau and:
(i) Who customarily and regularly directs the work of at least two
(2) or more other employees therein;
(ii) Who has the authority to hire and fire, or to recommend hiring
and firing; or whose recommendation on these and other actions af-
fecting employees is given particular weight; and
(iii) Who customarily and regularly exercises discretionary pow-
ers.
(b) Final designation of a position as "executive" in this definition
shall be made by the administrator. Exceptions to this designation that
do not violate the federal fair labor standards act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et
seq., may be made by the administrator.
(13) "Exempt employee" means any employee, classified or nonclassi-
fied, who is determined to be an executive, professional or administrative
employee as defined in this section or who qualifies for any other exemption
from cash compensation for overtime under applicable federal law. Final
designation of a classified position as exempt shall be made by the adminis-
trator.
(14) "Full-time employee" means any employee working a forty (40) hour
workweek.
(15)(a) "Holiday" means any day so designated by the president of the
United States or the governor of this state for a public fast, thanks-
giving or holiday. Holidays are enumerated in section 73-108, Idaho
Code.
(b) In the event that a holiday occurs on a Saturday, the preceding Fri-
day shall be a holiday, and if the holiday falls on a Sunday, the follow-
ing Monday shall be a holiday.
(c) A holiday is a day of exemption from work granted to nonexecutive
employees during which said employees shall be compensated as if they
actually worked. Employees classified as executive exempt are entitled
to eleven (11) paid holidays per year. If such an employee works on one
(1) of the official holidays listed in this subsection, then such em-
ployee may take an alternative day off but shall not receive additional
compensation.


(16) "Hours worked" means those hours actually spent in the performance
of the employee's job on any day including holidays and shall not include va-
cation or sick leave or other approved leave of absence.
(17) "Nonclassified employee" means any person appointed to or holding
a position in any department of the state of Idaho, which position is ex-
empted from the merit provisions of section 67-5309(e), (f), (g), (j), (m),
(o), (p), (w), and (x), Idaho Code.
(18) "Normal workweek" means any forty (40) hours worked during a par-
ticular one hundred sixty-eight (168) hour period as previously established
by the employee's appointing authority.
(19) "Open competitive examination" means an examination that may be
taken by qualified applicants to compete on an equal basis for listing on the
register of eligibles for a classified position.
(20) "Overtime work" means:
(a) Time worked on holidays and time worked in excess of forty (40)
hours in a period of one hundred sixty-eight (168) consecutive hours;
(b) Upon designation from the administrator and in the case of those
employees engaged in law enforcement, correctional, and fire protec-
tion activities characterized by irregular shift work schedules, time
worked in excess of one hundred sixty (160) hours in a period of twenty-
eight (28) consecutive days;
(c) Upon designation from the administrator and in the case of certain
employees who meet federal exemption requirements, time worked in ex-
cess of eighty (80) hours within a period of fourteen (14) consecutive
days; or
(d) Time worked by employees during specific hours in addition to their
normal schedules upon emergency declaration by the governor or with the
approval of the appointing authority and the board of examiners.
(21) "Participating department" means any department of the state of
Idaho in the executive department reporting to the governor or a board or
commission appointed by the governor.
(22) "Part-time employee" means any employee whose usually scheduled
work is fewer than forty (40) hours in a period of one hundred sixty-eight
(168) consecutive hours and who is not entitled to sick leave accruals pro-
vided in section 67-5333, Idaho Code, vacation leave provided in section
67-5334, Idaho Code, or holiday pay as defined in subsection (15) of this
section, unless contributions are being made to the public employee retire-
ment system in accordance with chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, and rules
promulgated by the public employee retirement system board.
(23) "Personnel system" means the procedure for administering employ-
ees in accordance with this chapter.
(24) "Political office" means a public office for which partisan poli-
tics is a basis for nomination, election or appointment.
(25) "Political organization" means a party that sponsors candidates
for election to political office.
(26) "Position" means a group of duties and responsibilities legally
assigned or delegated by one (1) or more appointing authorities and requir-
ing the employment of one (1) person.
(27) "Professional employee" means any person, nonclassified or clas-
sified, appointed to a position that meets the criteria set forth in the fed-


eral fair labor standards act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq. Final designation of a
classified position as professional shall be made by the administrator. Ex-
ceptions to this designation that do not violate the federal fair labor stan-
dards act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq., may be made by the administrator.
(28) "Public education entity" means community colleges, public school
districts, public charter schools and the Idaho digital learning academy.
(29) "Qualifying examination" means an examination or evaluation given
to a selected person to determine eligibility for reclassification or ap-
pointment to a position in a classification.
(30) "Register" means a list of names of persons who have been deter-
mined to be eligible for employment in a classified position as determined on
the basis of examination and merit factors as established by the administra-
tor.
(31) "Seasonal appointment" means an appointment to a position that is
permanent in nature but that has intermittent work periods throughout the
year.
(32) "Service rating" means a recorded evaluation of work performance
and promotional potential of an employee by his supervisor.
(33) "State educational agency" means the following state agencies and
educational institutions under the governance of the Idaho state board of
education:
(a) Boise state university;
(b) Idaho state university;
(c) University of Idaho;
(d) Lewis-Clark state college;
(e) Idaho public television;
(f) The division of vocational rehabilitation;
(g) The division of career technical education;
(h) The office of the state board of education;
(i) The state department of education; and
(j) The public charter school commission.
(34) "Temporary appointment" means appointment to a position that is
not permanent in nature and in which employment will not exceed one thousand
three hundred eighty-five (1,385) hours during any twelve (12) month period.
No person holding a temporary appointment may work in excess of one thousand
three hundred eighty-five (1,385) hours during a twelve (12) month period
of time for any one (1) department; provided, however, upon petition by the
appointing authority that demonstrates good cause, the administrator of
the division of human resources may extend the one thousand three hundred
eighty-five (1,385) hour limit for:
(a) Employees of the department of lands who are required to perform
fire suppression activities; and
(b) Employees hired under approved apprenticeship programs.
(35) "Vacation leave" means a period of exemption from work during which
employees shall be compensated. The term shall not include compensatory
time for overtime work.
(36) "Veteran" is as defined in section 65-203, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.